Hawaii statutes.
§334-59 Emergency examination and
hospitalization. (a) Initiation of proceedings. An emergency admission
may be initiated as follows:

(1) If a law enforcement officer has reason to
believe that a person is imminently dangerous to self or others, the officer
shall call for assistance from the mental health emergency workers designated
by the director. Upon determination by the mental health emergency workers
that the person is imminently dangerous to self or others, the person shall be
transported by ambulance or other suitable means, to a licensed psychiatric
facility for further evaluation and possible emergency hospitalization. A law
enforcement officer may also take into custody and transport to any facility
designated by the director any person threatening or attempting suicide. The
officer shall make application for the examination, observation, and diagnosis
of the person in custody. The application shall state or shall be accompanied
by a statement of the circumstances under which the person was taken into
custody and the reasons therefor which shall be transmitted with the person to
a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or psychologist at the
facility.

(2) Upon written or oral application of any licensed
physician, advanced practice registered nurse, psychologist, attorney, member
of the clergy, health or social service professional, or any state or county
employee in the course of employment, a judge may issue an ex parte order
orally, but shall reduce the order to writing by the close of the next court
day following the application, stating that there is probable cause to believe
the person is mentally ill or suffering from substance abuse, is imminently
dangerous to self or others and in need of care or treatment, or both, giving
the findings upon which the conclusion is based. The order shall direct that a
law enforcement officer or other suitable individual take the person into
custody and deliver the person to a designated mental health program, if
subject to an assisted community treatment order issued pursuant to part VIII
of this chapter, or to the nearest facility designated by the director for
emergency examination and treatment, or both. The ex parte order shall be made
a part of the patient's clinical record. If the application is oral, the
person making the application shall reduce the application to writing and shall
submit the same by noon of the next court day to the judge who issued the oral
ex parte order. The written application shall be executed subject to the penalties
of perjury but need not be sworn to before a notary public.

(3) Any licensed physician, advanced practice
registered nurse, physician assistant, or psychologist who has examined a
person and has reason to believe the person is:

(A) Mentally ill or suffering from substance
abuse;

(B) Imminently dangerous to self or others;
and

(C) In need of care or treatment;

may direct transportation, by ambulance or other
suitable means, to a licensed psychiatric facility for further evaluation and
possible emergency hospitalization. A licensed physician, an advanced practice
registered nurse, or physician assistant may administer treatment as is
medically necessary, for the person's safe transportation. A licensed
psychologist may administer treatment as is psychologically necessary.

(b) Emergency examination. A patient who is
delivered for emergency examination and treatment to a facility designated by
the director shall be examined by a licensed physician or advanced practice
registered nurse without unnecessary delay, and may be given such treatment as
is indicated by good medical practice. A psychiatrist, advanced practice
registered nurse, or psychologist may further examine the patient to diagnose
the presence or absence of a mental disorder, assess the risk that the patient
may be dangerous to self or others, and assess whether or not the patient needs
to be hospitalized.

(c) Release from emergency examination. If
the physician or advanced practice registered nurse who performs the emergency
examination, in consultation with a psychologist if applicable, concludes that
the patient need not be hospitalized, the patient shall be discharged
immediately unless the patient is under criminal charges, in which case the
patient shall be returned to the custody of a law enforcement officer.

(d) Emergency hospitalization. If the
physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or psychologist who performs the
emergency examination has reason to believe that the patient is:

(1) Mentally ill or suffering from substance abuse;

(2) Imminently dangerous to self or others; and

(3) In need of care or treatment, or both;

the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or
psychologist may direct that the patient be hospitalized on an emergency basis
or cause the patient to be transferred to another psychiatric facility for
emergency hospitalization, or both. The patient shall have the right
immediately upon admission to telephone the patient's guardian or a family
member including a reciprocal beneficiary, or an adult friend and an attorney.
If the patient declines to exercise that right, the staff of the facility shall
inform the adult patient of the right to waive notification to the family
including a reciprocal beneficiary, and shall make reasonable efforts to ensure
that the patient's guardian or family including a reciprocal beneficiary, is
notified of the emergency admission but the patient's family including a
reciprocal beneficiary, need not be notified if the patient is an adult and
requests that there be no notification. The patient shall be allowed to confer
with an attorney in private.

(e) Release from emergency hospitalization.
If at any time during the period of emergency hospitalization the responsible
physician concludes that the patient no longer meets the criteria for emergency
hospitalization the physician shall discharge the patient. If the patient is
under criminal charges, the patient shall be returned to the custody of a law
enforcement officer. In any event, the patient must be released within
forty-eight hours of the patient’s admission, unless the patient voluntarily
agrees to further hospitalization, or a proceeding for court-ordered evaluation
or hospitalization, or both, is initiated as provided in section 334-60.3. If
that time expires on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the time for initiation is
extended to the close of the next court day. Upon initiation of the
proceedings the facility shall be authorized to detain the patient until
further order of the court. [L 1976, c 130, pt of §4; am L 1977, c 76, pt of
§3; am L 1984, c 188, §1; am L 1985, c 68, §6; am L 1986, c 335, §§2, 3; am L
1992, c 138, §1; gen ch 1993; am L 1994, c 58, §1; am L 1997, c 383, §45; am L
2009, c 151, §15; am L 2013, c 221, §§4, 24 and c 232, §3; am L 2015, c 27, §2;
am L 2016, c 55, §51, c 114, §§2, 6, and c 183, §3]

Case Notes

Several provisions of section held to violate Fourteenth Amendment
due process rights. 438 F. Supp. 1106.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next